New York, session 2025-2026, S6942.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 903 of the education law, as 2 amended by chapter 183 of the laws of 2017, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 1. A health certificate shall be furnished by each student in the 5 public schools upon [his or her] such student's entrance in such schools 6 and upon [his or her] such student's entry into the grades prescribed by 7 the commissioner in regulations, provided that such regulations shall 8 require such certificates at least twice during the elementary grades 9 and twice in the secondary grades. An examination and health history of 10 any child may be required by the local school authorities at any time in 11 their discretion to promote the educational interests of such child. 12 Each certificate shall be signed by a duly licensed physician, physician 13 assistant, or nurse practitioner, who is authorized by law to practice 14 in this state, and consistent with subdivision three of section six 15 thousand nine hundred two of this chapter, or by a duly licensed physi- 16 cian, physician assistant, or nurse practitioner, who is authorized to 17 practice in the jurisdiction in which the examination was given, 18 provided that the commissioner has determined that such jurisdiction has 19 standards of licensure and practice comparable to those of New York. 20 Each such certificate shall describe the condition of the student when 21 the examination was made, which shall not be more than twelve months 22 prior to the commencement of the school year in which the examination is 23 required, and shall state whether such student is in a fit condition of 24 health to permit [his or her] such student's attendance at the public 25 schools. The examination may include a diabetes risk analysis. Each such EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10701-01-5 S. 6942 2 1 certificate shall also state the student's body mass index (BMI) and 2 weight status category. For purposes of this section, BMI is computed as 3 the weight in kilograms divided by the square of height in meters or the 4 weight in pounds divided by the square of height in inches multiplied by 5 a conversion factor of 703. Weight status categories for children and 6 adolescents shall be as defined by the commissioner of health. Each 7 certificate shall also state that the student has undergone a heart test 8 such as an electrocardiogram, and state whether the student is fit to 9 participate in physical education or other physical or athletic activ- 10 ities. In all school districts such physician, physician assistant or 11 nurse practitioner shall determine whether a one-time test for sickle 12 cell anemia is necessary or desirable and [he or she] they shall conduct 13 such a test and the certificate shall state the results. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.